Hawaii, session 2026, HB1952.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the university of Hawaii college of tropical agriculture and human resilience's agricultural research and extension station on Kauai develops research-based solutions to pests, diseases, and climate-adaptation challenges in the production of coffee, cacao, orchids, vegetables, forages, and goat. The legislature further finds that this agricultural research and extension station also serves as the primary location of invasive species research and coordination; seed production; Native Hawaiian kalo collection; and delivery of multi-language training in pest and disease management, soil fertility, pesticide education, and food safety on Kauai. However, many of the station's facilities are very old and do not comply with the requirements of the Americans with Disabilities Act.  Furthermore, the community on Kauai has expressed an urgent need for a certified kitchen for developing culturally relevant recipes and products and addressing food and nutritional insecurity challenges. Therefore, the purpose of this Act is to authorize the issuance of general obligation bonds and appropriate funds to the university of Hawaii college of tropical agriculture and human resilience's agricultural research and extension station on Kauai for much-needed capital improvements to support its mission and benefit the broader community. SECTION 2.  The director of finance is authorized to issue general obligation bonds in the sum of $5,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary is appropriated for fiscal year 2026-2027 for capital improvements for the university of Hawaii college of tropical agriculture and human resilience's agricultural research and extension station on Kauai, including: (1)  Decommissioning a cesspool; (2)  Demolition of old buildings; (3)  Design, plans, and construction for new laboratories, greenhouses, and field research facilities; (4)  A certified kitchen; (5)  Farm manager cottages; (6)  Fencing; and (7)  Improvements necessary to comply with the requirements of the Americans with Disabilities Act. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the university of Hawaii for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  The appropriation made for the capital improvement project authorized by this Act shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal biennium for which the appropriation is made; provided that all moneys from the appropriation unencumbered as of June 30, 2028, shall lapse as of that date. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________